District of Columbia statutes.
26-1016

Authorized delegate contracts.

A Licensee which purposes to conduct licensed activities through an authorized delegate shall authorize each delegate to operate pursuant to an express written contract appointing the person as its delegate with authority to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 17, 47 DCR 3431
This section is referenced in § 26-1001 and § 26-1003.